District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-2334

Design and construction of facilities.

Repealed.

History

Dec. 24, 1970, 84 Stat. 1579, Pub. L. 91-587, § 4
Aug. 4, 1986, 100 Stat. 1790, Pub. L. 99-371, § 410

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1834.
1973 Ed., § 31-1074.